Hawaii statutes.
§412:7-305 General requirement for
investments. A savings and loan association shall make investments that
are consistent with prudent banking practices and in compliance with all
applicable federal and state law. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next